Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 2
EARLY CHILDHOOD COUNCILS

26.5-2-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that there is a critical need to increase services for young children and their families, including those families with members who are entering the workforce due to Colorado's reform of the welfare system, making the transition off of welfare, or needing child care assistance to avoid the welfare system. The statewide need includes increasing and sustaining the quality, accessibility, capacity, and affordability of services for children and their parents to help parents raise their children to be successful at school, at work, and in the community.

Research demonstrates that there are positive outcomes for young children and their families who receive quality, integrated child care and related services in their early, preschool years, delivered through a comprehensive early childhood system that includes quality care and education, family support, health, and mental health programs.

Providers of half-day preschool and full-day child care services have to overcome barriers and inflexible requirements of the various sources of funding in order to design and implement programs that are more responsive to the needs of working families.

Consideration of various state and federal funding sources would allow for an integrated delivery system of quality programs for young children and their families in Colorado's communities.

An integrated delivery system would further enhance the ability of the department to identify the best practices relative to increasing and sustaining quality and to meeting the diverse needs of families seeking child care and other early childhood services.

Distinctly local needs and conditions require that the state design and integrate a system that has the flexibility to adapt to those local needs.

It is therefore in the state's best interest to establish a comprehensive system of early childhood councils to increase and sustain the availability, accessibility, capacity, and quality of early childhood services throughout the state, as provided in this part 2.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 594, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Council" or "early childhood council" means an early childhood council identified or established locally in communities throughout the state pursuant to section 26.5-2-203 or 26.5-5-102 for the purpose of developing and ultimately implementing a comprehensive system of early childhood services to ensure the school readiness of children five years of age or younger in the community.

"County department" means the county or district department of human or social services.

"Early childhood education program" means a child care program licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 that provides child care and education to children five years of age or younger.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 595, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-101.5 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-203. Early childhood councils - established - rules.

There is established a statewide integrated system of early childhood councils to improve and sustain the availability, accessibility, capacity, and quality of early childhood services for children and families throughout the state. The councils have consistent function and structure statewide and are governed by the department with input, cooperation, and support services from the departments of human services, education, and public health and environment.

The statewide system of early childhood councils consists of existing early childhood councils, renamed through this part 2 as "early childhood councils", and new councils designated and convened pursuant to this part 2, subject to available appropriations.

For new councils or for existing councils or partnerships that decide to reconfigure pursuant to this part 2, the board or boards of county commissioners shall designate a convening entity, which may include but is not limited to a local resource and referral agency, a county department of human services or social services, a local school district, a department of public health, or, prior to July 1, 2023, a Colorado preschool program council. The convening entity may convene a council either as part of a single county or as part of a multi-county regional network.

The executive director shall determine by rule the criteria necessary for establishing a single council for an area.

Nothing in this part 2 requires an existing council to reconfigure or reconvene.

Nothing in this part 2 requires a county to establish an early childhood council or to be a part of a multi-county council.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 595, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-103 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-204. Early childhood councils - applications - rules.

A newly established or newly identified council shall submit to the department an application to become part of the statewide system of early childhood councils. The department shall develop and distribute the application form and criteria and an explanation of the process for joining the statewide system of early childhood councils. The department shall provide support for the preparation of applications.

A new council shall designate on its application the following information:

The intended service area;

The counties to be involved in the council;

Participating mandatory stakeholders;

The entity that serves as the original fiscal agent for the council; and

The signatures of the chair or chairs of the board or boards of county commissioners for the counties involved in the council, the legal signatory for the counties, and the president of a school district board of education involved in the council.

An existing early childhood council seeking to be newly identified as a council shall designate on its application a restatement of the following information:

The designated service area;

Current members;

Any additional stakeholders required to meet the membership requirements of section 26.5-2-205;

The designated fiscal agent; and

Signatures of the current organization leadership, the fiscal agent, the chair or chairs of the board or boards of county commissioners of the counties involved in the council, and the president of a school district board of education involved in the council.

Each council shall develop a strategic plan based upon an assessment of the early childhood needs in the designated service area that includes:

A council infrastructure, including a plan for hiring a council director;

A technical assistance plan and an annual budget for developing a local early childhood system and infrastructure to improve and coordinate early childhood services; and

A plan for evaluating program performance and council process and effectiveness as it relates to the council's strategic plan.

The executive director shall promulgate rules to define the standards for acceptance of applications made pursuant to this section. Acceptance of an application is automatic if the application is complete, the signatures are in order, and it meets the standards set forth by the executive director pursuant to this subsection (5).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 596, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-103.3 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-205. Early childhood councils - membership.

To the extent practicable, each council must be representative of the various public and private stakeholders in the local community who are committed to supporting the well-being of children five years of age or younger.

For the purposes of this part 2, each council, whether newly established in a community or newly identified to serve as a council, shall work toward consolidating and coordinating funding, including the school-readiness quality improvement funding described in section 26.5-5-102. Together, the councils throughout the state shall serve to create a seamless system of early childhood services representing collaboration among the various public and private stakeholders for the effective delivery of early childhood services to children five years of age or younger in a manner that is responsive to local needs and conditions.

Each new council consists of members to be approved initially by the convening entity as designated pursuant to section 26.5-2-203. Each individual council shall determine subsequent appointments and rules for rotation of terms.

Early childhood council membership must include representatives from the public and private stakeholders from early care and education, family support, health, and mental health programs who reflect local needs and cultural diversity. The membership of each early childhood council must also represent the geographic diversity within the county or counties involved in the council. Each council must include a minimum of ten members with representation from each of the following stakeholder groups within the council's service area:

Local government, including but not limited to county commissioners, city council members, local school district board members, and local county departments of human or social services;

Early care and education, including but not limited to licensed and legally exempt child care providers, head start grantees, and district preschool programs operating pursuant to article 28 of title 22, as it exists prior to July 1, 2023;

Health care, including but not limited to local public health agencies; health-care providers; supplemental food programs for women, infants, and children as provided for in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1786; early periodic screening and diagnosis and treatment programs as required by federal law; and part B and part C of the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended;

Parents of children five years of age or younger;

Mental health care, including but not limited to community mental health centers and local mental health-care providers;

Resource and referral agencies, including but not limited to child care resource and referral agencies; and

Family support and parent education, including but not limited to home visitation programs, family resource centers, and income assistance programs.

In addition, each council may include, but is not limited to, representation from any combination of the following stakeholder groups within the council's service area:

Child care associations;

Medical and dental professionals;

School district parent organizations;

Head start policy councils;

A chamber or chambers of commerce;

Local businesses;

Faith-based and nonprofit organizations;

Higher education institutions; and

Libraries.

Each member of a council shall sign a memorandum of understanding on behalf of the organization the member represents to participate in and collaborate on the work of the council.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 597, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-103.5 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-206. Early childhood councils - duties.

Each early childhood council has, at a minimum, the following duties and functions:

To apply for early childhood funding pursuant to section 26.5-2-207;

To increase and sustain the quality, accessibility, capacity, and affordability of early childhood services for children five years of age or younger and their parents. To this end, each council shall develop and execute strategic plans to respond to local needs and conditions.

To establish a local system of accountability to measure local progress based on the needs and goals set for program performance;

To report annually the results of the accountability measurements defined in subsection (1)(c) of this section;

To select a fiscal agent to disburse funds and serve as the employer of the council director, once hired. The fiscal agent may or may not be a county.

To develop and implement a strategic plan as described in section 26.5-2-204 (4), including a comprehensive evaluation and report; and

To actively attempt to inform and include small or under-represented early childhood service providers in early childhood council activities and functions.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 599, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-103.7 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-207. Early childhood councils - waivers - rules - funding - application.

A local council may request a waiver of any rule that would prevent a council from implementing council projects. The local council shall submit the request to the early childhood leadership commission created in part 3 of article 1 of this title 26.5. The early childhood leadership commission shall consult with the affected state agency in reviewing the request. The department or other affected state agency shall grant waivers upon recommendation by the commission.

The executive director shall promulgate rules to develop and distribute to councils the application form and application process to be used by each council seeking to receive council infrastructure, quality improvement, technical assistance, and evaluation funding from the early childhood cash fund created in section 26.5-2-209 and other funding sources appropriated for early childhood services.

The department shall, upon receipt, review applications for early childhood funding from the early childhood cash fund established in section 26.5-2-209 and other funding sources appropriated for early childhood services.

The department is authorized to enter into a sole-source contract with any council to increase and sustain the quality, accessibility, capacity, and affordability of early childhood services for young children and their parents.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 599, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-104 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-208. Evaluation.

No later than March 1, 2010, the department shall, through a request for proposals process, contract with a qualified individual or entity to prepare an independent evaluation of the system of early childhood councils to determine the effectiveness of the system in serving children and families throughout the state. The evaluation must be completed no later than October 1, 2010, and must be repeated every three years thereafter.

The evaluation must include the following:

An aggregate evaluation of local evaluation plan data as integrated and analyzed by the department, including an evaluation of the overall program performance and council process and effectiveness;

An evaluation of state program performance, including the efficiency and effectiveness of the department in meeting the needs of the councils;

An evaluation of the feasibility of combining the funding sources available pursuant to this part 2;

An evaluation of the barriers to delivery of quality early childhood services; and

An evaluation of the impact of waivers issued pursuant to section 26.5-2-207.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 600, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-108 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-2-209. Early childhood cash fund - creation.

There is created in the state treasury the early childhood cash fund, referred to in this part 2 as the "fund", that consists of such money as may be appropriated to the fund by the general assembly and credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this part 2.

The department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private and public sources for the purposes of this part 2. All private and public money received through gifts, grants, or donations must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the department for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this part 2.

Any money in the fund not expended for the purposes of this part 2 may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund must be credited to the fund.

The department may expend up to, but not exceeding, five percent of the money annually appropriated from the fund to offset the costs incurred in implementing this part 2.

Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and is not credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 600, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.5-109 as it existed prior to 2022.